Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.7541

DNA identification system—Collection of biological samples—Fees prior to July 1, 2023—Distribution—Waiver.

(1) The clerk of the court shall transmit 80 percent of any amounts collected for fees imposed prior to July 1, 2023, for the collection of an offender's DNA to the state treasurer for deposit in the state DNA database account created under RCW 43.43.7532, and shall transmit 20 percent of the fee collected to the agency responsible for collection of a biological sample from the offender as required under RCW 43.43.754.

(2) Upon motion by the offender, the court shall waive any fee for the collection of the offender's DNA imposed prior to July 1, 2023.

[ 2023 c 449 s 4; 2018 c 269 s 18; 2015 c 265 s 31; 2011 c 125 s 1; 2008 c 97 s 3; 2002 c 289 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 449: See note following RCW 13.40.058.

Construction—2018 c 269: See note following RCW 10.82.090.

Finding—Intent—2015 c 265: See note following RCW 13.50.010.

Severability—Effective date—2002 c 289: See notes following RCW 43.43.753.